sv: Typ av madrassöveryta: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plush top; Slät yta; Fast yta; Annat
hu: Matracfelső típusa: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plüss felület; Sima felület; Tight top; Egyéb
es: Tipo de cubierta de colchón: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Superficie afelpada; Superficie lisa; Superficie firme; Otro
vi: Loại mặt trên của nệm: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plush top; Mặt nhẵn; Tight top; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta gornje obloge madraca: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plush top; Glatki gornji sloj; Tight top; Ostalo
fr: Type de dessus de matelas: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plush top; Dessus lisse; Tight top; Autre
it: Tipo di superficie del materasso: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plush top; Superficie liscia; Tight top; Altro
lt-LT: Čiužinio viršaus tipas: Papildomas paminkštinimas („Box top“); „Euro“ tipo viršus; Pagalvės tipo viršus; Pliušinis viršus; Lygus viršus; Standus viršus; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de superfície do colchão: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plush top; Topo liso; Tight top; Outro
bg-BG: Тип горен слой на матрака: Бокс топ; Евро топ; Пилоу топ; Плюшен топ; Гладък топ; Твърд топ; Друго
pl: Typ górnej warstwy materaca: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plush top; Gładki wierzch; Tight top; Inne
nb: Madrassoverdel-type: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plush top; Glatt topp; Tight top; Annet
th: ประเภทท็อปเปอร์ที่นอน: บ็อกซ์ท็อป; ยูโรท็อป; พิลโลว์ท็อป; พลัชท็อป; สมูทท็อป; ไทต์ท็อป; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta vrhnjega dela vzmetnice: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plišasti vrh; Gladki vrh; Napeti vrh; Drugo
pt-BR: Colchão tipo de superfície: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plush top; Topo liso; Tight top; Outro
cs: Typ svrchní vrstvy matrace: Box top; Euro top; Polštářová vrchní část; Plyšová vrchní část; Hladká vrchní část; Pevná vrchní část; Jiné
da: Madrastop-type: Box-top; Euro-top; Pillow-top; Blød top; Glat top; Fast top; Andet
fi: Patjanpäällisen tyyppi: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Pehmeä pintakerros; Sileä pintakerros; Kiinteä pintakerros; Muu
ko: 매트리스 상단 유형: 박스 탑; 유로 탑; 필로우 탑; 플러시 탑; 스무스 탑; 타이트 탑; 기타
nl: Matras toplaag type: Boxtop; Eurotop; Pillowtop; Plush-top; Gladde bovenkant; Tight-top; Overige
ru: Тип верхнего слоя матраса: Бокс-топ; Евро-топ; Пиллоу-топ; Плюш-топ; Гладкий топ; Жесткий топ; Другое
en: Mattress top type: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plush top; Smooth top; Tight top; Other
el: Τύπος επιφάνειας στρώματος: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Βελούδινο ανώστρωμα; Λείο ανώστρωμα; Tight top; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ vrchnej časti matraca: Box top; Euro top; Vankúšový top; Plyšový top; Hladký top; Pevný top; Iné
zh-TW: 床墊表層類型: 箱型床面; 歐陸式床面; 枕墊式; 柔軟床面; 平滑床面; 緊實床面; 其他
de: Typ der Matratzenoberfläche: Box-Top; Euro-Top; Pillow-Top; Plush-Top; Smooth-Top; Tight-Top; Sonstiges
ja: マットレストップタイプ: ボックストップ; ユーロトップ; ピロートップ; プラッシュトップ; スムーストップ; タイトトップ; その他
zh-CN: 床垫表层类型: 箱式软顶; 欧式软顶; 枕式软顶; 长毛绒软顶; 平滑床垫顶; 紧实床垫顶; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de saltea superioară: Box top; Euro top; Pillow top; Plush top; Suprafață netedă; Tight top; Altele
tr: Yatak üst katman tipi: Kutu tipi ped (Box top); Euro ped; Yastık ped (Pillow top); Pelüş ped; Düz ped; Sıkı ped (Tight top); Diğer